Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 20.2. Northern Neck-Middle Peninsula Public Education Consortium.

§ 22.1-354.6.
Northern Neck-Middle Peninsula Public Education Consortium created; region defined; governing board; membership; terms; compensation and expenses.

The Northern Neck-Middle Peninsula Public Education Consortium is hereby established as an independent local entity without political subdivision status and shall be referred to in this chapter as the Consortium. For the purposes of this chapter and the work of the Consortium, “Northern Neck-Middle Peninsula” includes the Counties of Essex, Gloucester, King and Queen, King George, King William, Lancaster, Mathews, Middlesex, Northumberland, Richmond, and Westmoreland. The governing board of the Consortium shall consist of the school superintendents of the named localities, the President of Rappahannock Community College or his designee, the Director of the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, and seven nonlegislative citizen members representing business, industry, and community interests in the region, four of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates and three of whom shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. The region’s legislators, representing the Third, Fourth, Sixth, and Twenty-eighth Senatorial Districts and the Ninety-seventh, Ninety-eighth, and Ninety-ninth House Districts, shall serve as nonvoting advisory members of the board. Legislative members and members who serve by virtue of their office shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. The nonlegislative citizen members shall serve terms of two years and may be reappointed for successive terms. The board may appoint additional nonvoting advisory members to assist in the performance of its duties. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

No board members shall receive compensation or reimbursement for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The board shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from among its members and may provide such rules as it considers appropriate concerning its membership, quorum, and establishment of committees.

History.

2000, c. 676; 2004, c. 1000; 2016, c. 147.

The numbers of § 22.1-354.6 to 22.1-354.10

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 2000 act having been §§ 22.1-354.1 to 22.1-354.5.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 676, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the 2000 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2000 Session of the General Assembly, and signed into law by the Governor.” Funds were provided for Fiscal Year 2000-2001 by Item 141 E 13 of the Appropriation Act.

Acts 2004, c. 1000, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments or appointments to fill vacancies made after the effective date of this act shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000, in subsection A, inserted “as an independent local entity without political subdivision status” following “hereby established,” substituted “Senate Committee on Rules” for “Senate Committee on Privileges and Elections” and “legislators, representing the Fourth and Twenty-eighth Senatorial Districts and the Ninety-eighth, Ninety-ninth and One-hundredth House Districts, shall serve as nonvoting, advisory members of the board” for “legislators shall serve as nonvoting, advisory members of the board,” and added the fifth, sixth, eighth, and ninth sentences and substituted “vice chairman” for “vice-chairman” in subsection B.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 147, in subsection A, substituted “includes” for “shall include” and inserted “King George, King William,” in the second sentence, substituted “President of Rappahannock Community College or his designee” for “president or his designee of Rappahannock Community College” in the third sentence, inserted “Third,” “Sixth,” and “Ninety-seventh,” and deleted “and One-hundredth” preceding “House Districts” in the fourth sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-354.7.
Functions and duties.

The Consortium shall perform the following functions and duties:

Coordinate with those educational institutions and agencies in the Commonwealth and surrounding areas to develop joint educational initiatives;

Promote and establish, in conjunction with the Department of Education and the region’s public school divisions, regional programs to address area educational needs;

Coordinate the development and sharing of programs, educational techniques, and resources among and between the region’s school divisions and institutions of higher education to enhance the educational opportunities for students and teachers in the Northern Neck-Middle Peninsula region; and

Provide technical assistance to school divisions throughout the Commonwealth for the implementation of effective educational programs.

History.

2000, c. 676.

§ 22.1-354.8.
Executive director; staff support.

From such funds as may be appropriated or received, the board of the Consortium may appoint an executive director, who shall be authorized to employ such staff as necessary to enable the Consortium to perform its duties as set forth in this chapter. The board is authorized to determine the duties of such staff and to fix salaries and compensation from such funds as may be appropriated or received.

History.

2000, c. 676.

§ 22.1-354.9.
Application for and acceptance of gifts and grants.

The Consortium is authorized to apply for, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from public or private sources to enable it to carry out its objectives.

History.

2000, c. 676.

§ 22.1-354.10.
Cooperation of other agencies.

All agencies of the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the Consortium and, upon request, assist the Consortium in the performance of its duties and responsibilities.

History.

2000, c. 676.